Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Water Service Regulation Act:

(1) Commission shall mean the Public Service Commission; and

(2) Private water company shall mean a privately owned entity organized for the purpose of furnishing water for domestic use or sewer services or both to the public, cities, villages, special districts, or other political subdivisions but shall not include (a) any entity that furnishes water for domestic use or sewer services to a mobile home park, (b) bottled water suppliers, or (c) any group of property owners who cooperatively own a water well for the sole purpose of providing water for domestic use to their property if each owner has an equal vote in determining the rates charged for the water.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 2.